Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 521.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adjunctive therapies” means to treat the human body by manual, mechanical, electrical, or natural methods, or by the use of physical means which include light, heat, water, or exercise in preparation for a chiropractic adjustment or manipulation.

“Board” means the Board of Chiropractic created under section 527 of this title.

“The practice of chiropractic” means the diagnosis of human ailments and diseases related to subluxations, joint dysfunctions, and neuromuscular and skeletal disorders for the purpose of their detection, correction, or referral in order to restore and maintain health, including pain relief, without providing drugs or performing surgery; the use of physical and clinical examinations, conventional radiologic procedures and interpretation, as well as the use of diagnostic imaging read and interpreted by a person so licensed and clinical laboratory procedures to determine the propriety of a regimen of chiropractic care; adjunctive therapies approved by the Board, by rule, to be used in conjunction with chiropractic treatment; and treatment by adjustment or manipulation of the spine or other joints and connected neuromusculoskeletal tissues and bodily articulations.

“Chiropractor” or “chiropractic physician” means a person licensed under this chapter.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken by the Board against a person licensed under this chapter or an applicant premised on a finding that the person has engaged in unprofessional conduct. The term includes all sanctions of any kind, including refusing to give an examination, refusing to grant or renew a license, suspending or revoking a license, placing limitations or restrictions upon a license, and issuing reprimands and warnings.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 25

, § 9;

2013, No. 27

, § 2.

§ 522.
Prohibitions.

A person shall not practice chiropractic or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State unless he or she is licensed under this chapter.

A person shall not use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating that the person is a chiropractor, chiropractic physician, or doctor of chiropractic unless the person is licensed under this chapter.

A person shall not work as a chiropractic intern unless he or she is registered as required by this chapter.

A person who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 29

, § 18.

§ 523.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following persons acting within the scope of their respective professional practices:

A person licensed to practice medicine and surgery under chapter 23 of this title.

A person licensed to practice osteopathic medicine under chapter 33 of this title.

A physician assistant licensed or registered under chapter 31 of this title.

A nurse licensed under chapter 28 of this title.

A physical therapist licensed under chapter 38 of this title.

A commissioned officer of the U.S. Armed Forces or Public Health Service when acting within the scope of his or her official duties.

A nonresident licensed chiropractor who comes into the State to treat or to consult on a particular case in this State, to perform research, or to participate in or instruct regular or continuing education courses, provided he or she does not otherwise practice in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 524.
Reporting of contagious and infectious diseases; death certificates.

Chiropractors shall be subject to the provisions of the law relating to contagious and infectious diseases and to the granting of certificates of deaths.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 525.
Competency requirements of licensees.

No person licensed by the Board shall apply ionizing radiation to human beings for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes without first having satisfied the Board of his or her competency to do so. The Board shall consult with the Board of Radiologic Technology concerning suitable performance standards to be adopted by rule. The Board shall, by rule, provide for periodic recertification of competency. A person subject to the provisions of this section shall be subject to the fees established under section 535 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 52

, § 6.